Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1005.
do enact as follows:SB1005,11Section 1. 25.40 (1) (a) 39. of the statutes is created to read:SB1005,2,3225.40 (1) (a) 39. Fees collected under s. 341.37 that are deposited into the 3conservation fund.SB1005,24Section 2. 27.01 (7) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1005,2,13527.01 (7) (d) Issuance of vehicle admission receipts. An annual vehicle 6admission receipt shall be issued by the department, shall indicate the month in 7which it is issued, and is valid until the final day of the 12th month following the 8month in which it is issued. An annual vehicle admission receipt shall be issued by 9the department to each applicant identified on the list provided by the department 10of transportation under s. 341.37 (2). An annual vehicle admission receipt may not 11be issued by the department for a motor bus. A daily vehicle admission receipt shall 12be issued by the department, shall state the date for which it is issued and is 13effective only for the date issued.SB1005,314Section 3. 341.08 (2) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1005,2,1715341.08 (2) (g) A place for the applicant to indicate that they wish to purchase 16an annual vehicle admission receipt under s. 27.01 (7) and that indicates the 17applicable fees for the purchase under s. 341.37 (1).SB1005,418Section 4. 341.37 of the statutes is created to read:SB1005,3,219341.37 State parks vehicle admission receipt fees. (1) An applicant for 20original registration or renewal of registration of a vehicle who indicates that they 21wish to purchase an annual vehicle admission receipt under s. 27.01 (7) shall pay, in 1addition to the vehicle registration fee, the issuing fee provided under s. 27.01 (7) 2(gr) and one of the following fees:SB1005,3,43(a) Except as provided in pars. (b) and (c), the fee provided under s. 27.01 (7) 4(f) 1.SB1005,3,75(b) If the applicant or a member of the applicant’s household owns a vehicle 6for which a current annual vehicle admission receipt has been issued, the fee 7provided under s. 27.01 (7) (gm) 1.SB1005,3,98(c) If the applicant is a resident senior citizen, as defined in s. 29.001 (72), the 9fee provided under s. 27.01 (7) (gm) 3.SB1005,3,1210(2) On a weekly basis, the department shall provide to the department of 11natural resources a list of applicants who have purchased an annual vehicle 12admission receipt under this section.SB1005,3,1513(3) On a quarterly basis, the department shall deposit all moneys collected as 14fees under sub. (1) (a) to (c) in the conservation fund for use for state parks, state 15recreation areas, recreation areas in state forests, and the Bong area lands.SB1005,516Section 5. Effective date.SB1005,3,1817(1) This act takes effect on first day of the 13th month beginning after 18publication.SB1005,3,1919